test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sidaam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sidām: # Noun 157 'eng /est lible/fin' - full paradigm
     sidām+N+Sg+Nom: sidām
     sidām+N+Sg+Gen: sidām
     sidām+N+Sg+Par: sidāmt
     sidām+N+Sg+Dat: sidāmõn
     sidām+N+Sg+Ins: sidāmõks
     sidām+N+Sg+Ill: sidāmõ
     sidām+N+Sg+Ela: sidāmõst
     sidām+N+Pl+Nom: sidāmõd
     sidām+N+Pl+Gen: sidāmõd
     sidām+N+Pl+Par: sidāmidi
     sidām+N+Pl+Dat: sidāmõdõn
     sidām+N+Pl+Ins: sidāmõdõks
     sidām+N+Pl+Ill: sidāmiž
     sidām+N+Pl+Ela: sidāmist
